apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="liv/e__vblex">
    <e c="CP: regular verbs ending in -e (e,es,ing,ed)">
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ied</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ied</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enjoy__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ys</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>id</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>id</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ide</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ide</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ides</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ode</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ided</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ode</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ided</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iding</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iding</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iding</l> 
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="approach__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="admit__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ted</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ted</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fit__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ting</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="admit">
        <i>admit</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="attach">
        <i>attach</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="believe">
        <i>believ</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bury">
        <i>bur</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="carry">
        <i>carr</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="chat">
        <i>chat</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="commit">
        <i>commit</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="confess">
        <i>confess</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="consume">
        <i>consum</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="convey">
        <i>convey</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="copy">
        <i>cop</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="decay">
	    <i>decay</i> 
	    <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="delay">
        <i>delay</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="deploy">
        <i>deploy</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="destroy">
        <i>destroy</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="devastate">
        <i>devastat</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="dignify">
        <i>dignify</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="dish">
        <i>dish</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="display">
        <i>display</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="dry">
        <i>dr</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="evoke">
        <i>evok</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="extinguish">
	    <i>extinguish</i> 
	    <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fit">
        <i>fit</i> 
        <par n="fit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fortify">
        <i>fortif</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="gloss">
        <i>gloss</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="impose">
        <i>impos</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="knit">
        <i>knit</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="lay">
        <i>la</i> 
        <par n="pa/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="lunch">
        <i>lunch</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="marry"><i>marr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="merge">
        <i>merg</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="obey">
        <i>obey</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="omit">
        <i>omit</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pay">
        <i>pa</i> 
        <par n="pa/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="prejudice">
        <i>prejudic</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="progress">
        <i>progress</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="quit">
	    <i>quit</i> 
	    <par n="fit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="regret">
        <i>regret</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="rely">
        <i>rel</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="retrieve">
        <i>retriev</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="rot">
	    <i>rot</i> 
	    <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="say">
        <i>sa</i> 
        <par n="pa/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="stress">
        <i>stress</i> 
        <par n="approach__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="surge into lead">
	   <i>surg</i> 
	   <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
	   <p>
		   <l><b/>into<b/>lead</l>
		   <r><g><b/>into<b/>lead</g></r>
	   </p>
   </e>
<e lm="try">
        <i>tr</i> 
        <par n="appl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="transmit">
        <i>transmit</i> 
        <par n="admit__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="annoy">
        <i>annoy</i> 
        <par n="enjoy__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pay cash">
      <i>pa</i> 
      <par n="pa/y__vblex"/> 
      <p>
         <l><b/>cash</l>
         <r><g><b/>cash</g></r>
      </p>
   </e>
<e lm="pay off">
      <i>pa</i> 
      <par n="pa/y__vblex"/> 
      <p>
         <l><b/>off</l>
         <r><g><b/>off</g></r>
      </p>
   </e>
